Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1317
Service award benefit; how paid; exempt from judicial process.

(1) The service award benefit received by a qualifying participant or beneficiary shall, at the option of the recipient, be in the form of an annuity or lump-sum benefit. No portion of any annual account shall be subject to attachment, garnishment, execution, or other judicial process for the satisfaction of a debt or claim against any participant or beneficiary and assignments or transfers of any portion shall be void.

(2) The service award benefit paid to a participant or beneficiary qualifying pursuant to section 35-1312 or 35-1313 shall be the participant's or beneficiary's nonforfeitable share of all annual accounts upon the date of his or her qualification for the service award benefit.

Laws 1999, LB 849, § 17.